apertium-mrj-fin.mrj.twol
! Hill Mari twol file

Alphabet

! Letters of the alphabet
а б в г д е ё ж з и й к л м н ҥ о ӧ п р с т у ӱ ф х ц ч ш щ ъ ы ь э ю я ӓ ӹ
А Б В Г Д Е Ё Ж З И Й К Л М Н Ҥ О Ӧ П Р С Т У Ӱ Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ Ъ Ы Ь Э Ю Я Ӓ Ӹ

! Archiphonemes for vowels
!  е1:е а1:а и1:и у1:у ӱ1:ӱ
!  Е1:Е А1:А И1:И У1:У Ӱ1:Ӱ
!JMR 2012-09-18
! А1:а 
 А1:ӓ

 Е3:е !ӓвӓмвлӓ 
 Е2:е
! Е2:0
! Ы1:ы
 Ы1:ӹ
! Ы1:0
! Ы2:ы
 Ы2:ӹ
! Ы2:0
 А2:а
! А2:я

 Ь2:0 ! except with V_АМ +Prt1+Sg1-3

!! Trigger
%^ConsTransf:0
%^KIN:0 ! with ӓвӓ in +PxSg1+Sg+Gen etc.

! Boundary symbols
! old !  +  /  {  _  $  }  @  ~  &  #
! new X1 X2 X3 X4 X5 X6 X7 X8 X9 Z1 Z2

! X1:0 X2:0 X3:0 X4:0 X5:0 X6:0 X7:0 X8:0 X9:0 Z1:0 Z2:0

! JMR 2012-09-18
 %>:0
 #:0
 %- !


 ;



Sets
BackLabVow =   о у ё ю О У Ё Ю ;
FrontLabVow =   ӧ ӱ Ӧ Ӱ;
NonLabVow =   ӓ а е и э я Ӓ А Е И Э Я ;
Vow =  BackLabVow FrontLabVow NonLabVow ы Ы  ӹ Ӹ ; 
BackVow = BackLabVow а А ы Ы ;
ArchiVow = Ы1 Ы2 А1 ;

Cons =  б в г д ж з к л м н ҥ п р с т ф х ц ч ш 
        Б В Г Д Ж З К Л М Н Ҥ П Р С Т Ф Х Ц Ч Ш ;
Cst =  к п т ф х ц ч ш с 
       К П Т Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Ц ;

Ltrs = Vow Cons Й й  ъ ь Ъ Ь ;

all =  Ltrs  %- ;




Definitions

! LFC = [ :NonLabVow | :FrontLabVow | Е2: | :е | :ӹ | :Ӹ ] \[ #: | :BackLabVow | ы | Ы ]* ;

LBC = [ :BackVow ] ( %>: | %^ConsTransf:0 | %^KIN:0 | BackVow | А1:а | А1:я | Ы1:ы | Ь2:0 | Ы1:0 | Е3:0 | Ы2:ы | Cons: )* ;


Rules


"Palatal mark loss before vowel"
    ь:0  <=>   _ %>: А2: ;
   ! JMR 2012-09-18
      
"Ь2:ь Palatal mark for V_АМ +Prt1+Sg1"
Ь2:ь <=> [ н | л ] _ %> Ы1: ;

! JMR 2012-09-18
"Onset vowel loss in suffix Ы1"
   Ы1:0 <=> :Vow ( %^KIN:0 ) %>: _ ;
           %>: ж Ы2: %>: _  ;

"Onset vowel loss in suffix Е3"
   Е3:0 <=> [ ю | ӱ | у | ё | о | ӧ | и | е | э | а | ӓ ] %^KIN:0 %>: _ ;
           %>: ж Ы2: %>: _  ;


"Onset vowel loss in suffix Е2"
   Е2:0 <=> %>: ж Ы2: %>: _  ;


!"Onset vowel Е2 realized in suffix"
!  Е2:е <=> Cons %>: _ ;

"Onset vowel Е2:э after retained vowel"
Е2:э <=> [ ю | ӱ | у | ё | о | ӧ | и | е | э | а | ӓ ] %> _ ;

"Onset vowel Е3:э after retained vowel"
Е3:э <=> [ ю | ӱ | у | ё | о | ӧ | и | е | э | а | ӓ ] %> _ ;

"Stem final ы loss before Е2"
ы:0 <=> #: Cons* Vow Cons+ _ %>  Е2: ;
           _ %> [ А1: | Е2: | Е3: ] ;

"Stem final ӹ loss before Е2"
ӹ:0 <=> #: Cons* Vow Cons+ _ %> Е2: ;
           _ %> [ А1: | Е2: | Е3: ] ;


"Onset vowel Ы1 realized in suffix"
  Ы1:ы <=> [ LBC  Cons ( %>: )| LBC ( н | л ) Ь2: %>: | BackVow й: ( Ь2:0 ) %> ] _ ;
![[ Cons | й ]+ %>: | %>: [ %>: | BackVow | е | ArchiVow: | Cons ]* [ Cons | й ] ( %>: ) ] _ ;

!"Onset vowel Ы1 realized in suffix"
!  Ы1:ӹ <=> LFC [ Cons | й ] %>: _ ;

!"Affix mid or final front А1:ӓ"
! А1:ӓ <=> LFC _ ;

"Affix mid or final back А1:а"
 А1:а <=> LBC (й %> Ы1: м ) _ ;
          BackVow  й: %^ConsTransf:0 %>: [ н | д ] _ ;

"Affix mid or final back А1:я"
 А1:я <=> й: %> _ ;

"Affix initial back а:я"
 а:я <=> й: %> _ ;

"suffix-final vowel backed "
 Ы2:ы <=> LBC Cons _ ;
          LBC й ( %^ConsTransf:0 ) %> [ ж | ш т ] _ ;

!! !!Consonant loss or transformation

"т:0 in am type verbs" !! лӓктӓш:лӓкнӓ
т:0 <=> к _ %^ConsTransf:0 ;

"к:0 in am type verbs" !! качкаш:качна
к:0 <=> [ ш | ч ] _ %^ConsTransf:0 ; 

"з:ц in am type verbs" !! вазаш:вацна
з:ц <=> [ Vow | н: ] _ %^ConsTransf:0 ;

"н:0 before з:ц in am type verbs" !! негӹнзӓш:негӹц
н:0 <=>  _ з: %^ConsTransf:0 ;


"suffix-final vowel loss after stem-final vowel"
  Ы2:0 <=>     Cons %>: [ Ы1: ш [ т | к ] | ж: ] _ %>: [ е ш | А2: | Ы1: ] ;
! Vow %>: [ Ы1: ш [ т | к ] | ж: ] _ %>: [ л | г | Ы1: ш | ш | д | Е2: | А2: ] ;

!"suffix-final vowel realized after stem-final consonant"
! Ы2:ы <=>  LBC %>: [ ж: | д Ы2: м | ( Ы1: ) м | ( Ы1: ) ш ] _ [ #: | %>: [ л | г | ш [ т | к ] | д | Ы1: [ м | н ] ]] ;
!          LBC %>: д _ м Ы2: ;
!Work 2012-10-29!!            %>:  Ы1: ш [ т | к ]  _ %>: Ы1: ;

!Work 2012-10-29!"suffix-final vowel realized as -Round in word-final position"
!Work 2012-10-29!  Ы2:е <=> :NonLabVow [ Cons | й | :ы | :0 ]* %>: ( ( ж: [ Ы2:е | Ы2:ы | Ы2:0 ] %>: ) [ Ы1: | ы ] ш [ т | к ] | ы ж | ж: | ш | м | д ы м ) _ [ #: | %- ] ;
!Work 2012-10-29!           :NonLabVow [ Cons | :ы | :0 ]* %>: [ ж: ] _ %> Ы1: ш [ #: | %- | %>: ] ;
!Work 2012-10-29!
!Work 2012-10-29!"suffix-final vowel realized as +Back +Round in word-final position"
!Work 2012-10-29!  Ы2:о <=> :BackLabVow [ Cons | :ы | :0 ]* %>: ( ( ж: [ Ы2:о | Ы2:ы | Ы2:0 ] %>: ) Ы1: ш [ т | к ] | ы ж | ж: | ш | м | д ы м ) _ [ #: | %- ] ;
!Work 2012-10-29!           :BackLabVow [ Cons | :ы | :0 ]* %>: [ ж: ] _ %> Ы1: ш [ #: | %- | %>: ] ;
!Work 2012-10-29!
!Work 2012-10-29!"suffix-final vowel realized as +Front +Round in word-final position"
!Work 2012-10-29!  Ы2:ӧ <=> :FrontLabVow [ Cons | :ы | :0 ]* %>: ( ( ж: [ Ы2:ӧ | Ы2:ы | Ы2:0 ] %>: ) Ы1: ш [ т | к ] | ы ж | ж: | ш | м | д ы м ) _ [ #: | %- ] ;
!Work 2012-10-29!           :FrontLabVow [ Cons | :ы | :0 ]* %>: [ ж: ] _ %> Ы1: ш [ #: | %- | %>: ] ;
!Work 2012-10-29!
!Work 2012-10-29!! Retaining stem-final _е1_ in adjectives and nouns
!Work 2012-10-29!! It has been removed from Vem stems
!Work 2012-10-29!! _е1_ follows much the same pattern as _Ы2_
!Work 2012-10-29!!
!Work 2012-10-29!"suffix-final vowel realized after stem-final consonant"
!Work 2012-10-29!  е1:ы <=>  Cons _ %>: [ л | г | ш | д | Ы1: ] ;
!Work 2012-10-29!
!Work 2012-10-29!"suffix-final vowel realized as -Round in word-final position"
!Work 2012-10-29!  е1:е <=> NonLabVow [ Cons | ы ]* Cons _ [ #: | %- ] ;
!Work 2012-10-29!
!Work 2012-10-29!"suffix-final vowel realized as +Back +Round in word-final position"
!Work 2012-10-29!  е1:о <=> BackLabVow [ Cons | ы ]* _ [ #: | %- ] ;
!Work 2012-10-29!
!Work 2012-10-29!"suffix-final vowel realized as +Front +Round in word-final position"
!Work 2012-10-29!  е1:ӧ <=> FrontLabVow [ Cons | ы ]* _ [ #: | %- ] ;
!Work 2012-10-29!
!Work 2012-10-29!
!Work 2012-10-29! 
!Work 2012-10-29!"Clitics in At and Ak take onset glide"
!Work 2012-10-29!  А2:я <=> ь:0 %>: _ [ т | к | м | ш ] ;
!Work 2012-10-29!! "A2 as я in й-final stems"
!Work 2012-10-29!           й:0 %>: _  ;

"й Deletion in front of я Suffix and others"
  й:0 <=> _ ( %^ConsTransf:0 ) %>: [ :я | :е | :и | :ю ]  ;


!Work 2012-10-29!"Clitics in At and Ak take onset glide"
!Work 2012-10-29!  А2:а <=> [ Cons ( Ы2:0 ) | :Vow ] %>: _ [ т | к | м | ш ] ;

! Devoicing
"Onset consonant devoicing"
 ж:ш <=> [ :Cst ( :0 ) | ж ] ( %^ConsTransf:0 ) %>: _ [ Ы1: | Ы2: ] ;
